apertium-fra-spa.fra.metadix
    <pardef n="/être__vbser">
      <e lm="soit"><p><l>soit</l>   <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>été</l>       <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l>               <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>est</l>              <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>c'est</l>     <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>furent</l>           <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fus</l>              <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fus</l>              <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fusse</l>            <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fussent</l>          <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fusses</l>           <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fussiez</l>          <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fussions</l>         <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fut</l>              <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fûmes</l>            <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fût</l>              <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fûtes</l>            <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sera</l>             <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>serai</l>            <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>seraient</l>         <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>serais</l>           <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>serais</l>           <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>serait</l>           <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>seras</l>            <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>serez</l>            <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>seriez</l>           <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>serions</l>          <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>serons</l>           <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>seront</l>           <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>soient</l>           <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sois</l>             <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sois</l>             <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>sois</l>             <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sois</l>             <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sommes</l>           <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sont</l>             <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>soyez</l>            <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>soyez</l>            <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>soyez</l>            <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>soyons</l>           <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>soyons</l>           <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>soyons</l>           <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>suis</l>             <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>étaient</l>          <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>étais</l>            <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>étais</l>            <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>était</l>            <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>étant</l>            <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>étant</l>            <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>étiez</l>            <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>étions</l>           <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>été</l>              <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>êtes</l>             <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>être</l>             <r>être<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="être">                           <par n="/être__vbser"/></e>
